Washington statutes.
RCW 19.112.110

Special fuel licensees—Required sales of biodiesel or renewable diesel fuel—Rules.

(1) Special fuel licensees under chapter 82.38 RCW, as determined by the department of licensing, must provide evidence to the department of licensing that at least two percent of the total annual diesel fuel sold in Washington is biodiesel or renewable diesel fuel, following the earlier of: (a) November 30, 2008; or (b) when a determination is made by the director, published in the Washington State Register, that feedstock grown in Washington state can satisfy a two-percent requirement.

(2) Special fuel licensees under chapter 82.38 RCW, as determined by the department of licensing, must provide evidence to the department of licensing that at least five percent of total annual diesel fuel sold in Washington is biodiesel or renewable diesel fuel, when the director determines, and publishes this determination in the Washington State Register, that both in-state oil seed crushing capacity and feedstock grown in Washington state can satisfy a three-percent requirement.

(3) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section may take effect no sooner than one hundred eighty days after the determination has been published in the Washington State Register.

(4) The director and the director of licensing must each adopt rules, in coordination with each other, for enforcing and carrying out the purposes of this section.

(5) To the extent that the requirements of this section conflict with the requirements of chapter 70A.535 RCW, the requirements of chapter 70A.535 RCW prevail.

[ 2021 c 317 s 26; 2013 c 225 s 601; 2009 c 132 s 2; 2006 c 338 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—2021 c 317: See note following RCW 70A.535.005.

Effective date—2013 c 225: See note following RCW 82.38.010.

Findings—Intent—2006 c 338: "The legislature finds that it is in the public interest to establish a market for alternative fuels in Washington. By requiring a growing percentage of our fuel supply to be renewable biofuel that meets appropriate fuel quality standards, we will reduce our dependence on imports of foreign oil, improve the health and quality of life for Washingtonians, and stimulate the creation of a new industry in Washington that benefits our farmers and rural communities. The legislature finds that it is in the public interest for the state to play a central role in spurring the market by purchasing an increasing amount of alternative fuels produced in Washington. The legislature finds that we must act now and that the time available before the requirements of this act take effect is sufficient for feedstock and fuel providers to prepare for successful implementation.

The legislature intends for consumers to have a choice of fuels and to encourage and promote the development, availability, and use of a diversity of renewable fuels and fuel blends ranging from fuels composed of no renewable content to completely renewable fuels." [ 2006 c 338 s 1.]